Tennessee, session 114, SB1724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-9-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (b):
(b) This section does not apply to a jailer refusing an arrestee pursuant to § 41-
4-145.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-4-103(a)(7), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(7) Except as provided in § 41-7-145, all other persons committed to the jail by
authority of law.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 4, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
41-4-145.
(a) A jailer may refuse to accept into the jail an arrestee if the arrestee:
(1) Requires medical attention; and
(2) Has been arrested for a misdemeanor that does not constitute a
crime against a person, under title 39, chapter 13.
(b)
(1) If a jailer refuses to accept an arrestee into the jail pursuant to
subsection (a), then the arresting agency must have the arrestee evaluated by a
healthcare provider.
SB1724
010493
- 1 -

(2) If a healthcare provider furnishes the arresting agency with a release
form specifying that the arrestee no longer requires medical attention or is
medically able to be confined to a jail, then the jailer shall accept the arrestee into
the jail.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010493